src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V21_odd
 V11_odd ;
!+V+Inf:%>уӈкве K ;

!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>е̄гум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>е̄гын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>и K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>име̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>егы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>е̄г K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>е̄в K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>егы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>е̄гыт K ;

!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>илум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>илын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>итэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>иламе̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>илы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>итэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>илув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>илы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>иягум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>иягын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ияге K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>иягме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>иягы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ияге̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>иягув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>иягы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ияга̄ныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>иянум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>иян K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>иянэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>иянме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ияны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>иянэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>иянув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ияны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ияна̄ныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>ысум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>ысын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ыс K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>ысаме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>ысы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>ысы̄г K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>ысӯв K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>ысы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>ысыт K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ыслум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ыслын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ыстэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ысламе̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ыслы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ыстэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ыслув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ыслы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ыса̄ныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ысагум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ысагын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ысаге K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ысагме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ысагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ысаге̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ысагув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ысагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ыса̄ныл K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ысаганыл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ысанум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ысан K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ысанэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ысанме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ысаны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ысанэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ысанув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ысаны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ысаныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>асум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>асын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ас K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>асаме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>асы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>асы̄г K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>асӯв K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>асы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>асыт K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>аслум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>аслын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>астэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>асламе̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>аслы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>астэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>аслув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>аслы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>аса̄ныл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>асагум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>асагын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>асаге K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>асагме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>асагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>асаге̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>асагув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>асагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>аса̄ныл K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>асаганыл K ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>асанум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>асан K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>асанэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>асанме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>асаны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>асанэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>асанув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>асаны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>асаныл K ;

!+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>нӯвум K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>нӯвын K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>нув K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>нуваме̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>нувы̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>нувы̄г K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>нувӯв K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>нувы̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>нӯвыт K ;

!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>нӯвлум K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>нӯвлын K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>нӯвтэ K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>нувламе̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>нувлы̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>нувтэ̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>нувлув K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>нувлын K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>нува̄гум K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>нува̄гын K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>нува̄ге K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>нувагме̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>нуваге̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>нувагув K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>нувага̄ныл K ;

!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>нува̄нум K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>нува̄нын K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>нува̄нэ K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>нуванме̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>нуванэ̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>нуванув K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>ынӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>ынӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>ынув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>ынуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>ынувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>ынувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>ынувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>ынувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>ынӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ынӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ынӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ынӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ынувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ынувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ынувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ынувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ынувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ынува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ынува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ынува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ынува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ынувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ынувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ынуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ынувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ынувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ынувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ынува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ынува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ынува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ынуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ынуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ынуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ынуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ынуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ынува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>анӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>анӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>анув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>ануваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>анувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>анувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>анувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>анувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>анӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>анӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>анӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>анӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>анувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>анувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>анувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>анувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>анувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>анува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>анува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>анува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>анува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>анувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>анувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ануваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>анувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>анувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>анувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>анува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>анува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>анува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ануванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ануваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ануванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ануванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ануваны̄н K ;
